Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.126

On-site revocation hearing—Cooperation in providing facilities.

All officers and employees of the state, counties, cities and political subdivisions of this state shall cooperate with the board in making available suitable facilities for conducting parole or community custody revocation hearings.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 339; 1969 c 98 s 8.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Severability—Effective date—1969 c 98: See notes following RCW 9.95.120.